Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 5. National Certification

§ 21-7-501.
National certification program; program limits and requirements; appropriations requirements; certified teacher pay incentive reimbursement.

The department of education may enter into an agreement with a nonprofit entity to establish a program under which the department or the nonprofit entity will administer a program to assist teachers in earning national board teacher certification. The agreement between the department and the nonprofit entity shall require annual reporting by the nonprofit entity to the department. The program may provide professional development and mentoring specific to national board teacher certification, along with other activities related to national certification. Additionally, on behalf of teachers employed by Wyoming school districts the program may make payments directly to an organization that provides national board teacher certification for not more than fifty percent (50%) of the fees to receive national certification, as established by the national board for professional teaching standards. The program shall only make payments if:

The teacher has completed at least three (3) years of teaching in the state of Wyoming;

The teacher timely pays the teacher’s portion of the certification fees and timely completes progress toward certification as required by the program; and

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 192, § 2.

The teacher agrees to reimburse the program for any certification fee payments the program makes on behalf of the teacher in the event the teacher fails to formally withdraw from the process or to submit an entry that can be scored, as determined by the program.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 192, § 2.

The legislature may appropriate funds to the department to implement subsection (a) of this section. No funds appropriated by the legislature shall be distributed to the program if the nonprofit entity with whom the department has entered into an agreement under subsection (a) of this section does not contribute to the program an amount equal to the amount that will be distributed from funds appropriated by the legislature. The department shall ensure that state funds and funds the nonprofit entity provides to the program shall be accounted for separately.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 192, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 193, § 2.

In addition to the program established under subsection (a) of this section, and to promote employment of national board certified teachers by school districts, each district employing a national board certified teacher shall be reimbursed for payments to these teachers subject to the following:

For each year the certificate is valid, the district provides each teacher employed by the district and holding certification by the national board for professional teaching standards a lump sum payment of four thousand dollars ($4,000.00) which is in addition to the teacher’s annual salary as determined by the board, and which is paid to each certified teacher between December 1 and December 31 of the school year for which application is made;

The teacher holding certification shall be employed by the district full time as a teacher;

The district submits a report to the department of education in a manner, on a form and at times specified by department rule and regulation, documenting the number of national board certified teachers employed by the district, verifying payments to such teachers in accordance with paragraph (i) of this subsection;

From amounts appropriated by the legislature from the public school foundation program account for purposes of this subsection, the department of education shall distribute payments to eligible districts in accordance with this subsection on or before February 15 of the applicable school year, together with the district’s foundation payment under W.S. 21-13-313(c), if applicable. The department shall not provide reimbursement to a school district for a lump sum payment made in accordance with paragraph (i) of this subsection to a teacher who earned initial national board teacher certification on or after January 1, 2021 and has received fifteen (15) lump sum payments under this subsection;

Not later than January 31 of each year, the department shall report to the joint education interim committee on district reports submitted under paragraph (iii) of this subsection and estimated distributions under this subsection to eligible districts for the applicable reporting period.

For purposes of this section, “teacher” means a school district employee who is employed full time as a teacher, instructional facilitator, certified tutor, librarian, speech-language therapist or counselor.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 69, § 1; 2001, ch. 193, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 108, § 1; 2014 ch. 96, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 192, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective April 1, 2007, added (f); and inserted “subsection (b) of” in (d).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (f)(ii), added “For purposes of this subsection, “teacher” shall include employees of the district holding certification and employed full-time as instructional facilitators, certified tutors, librarians or counselors.”

2019 Amendment Notes.—

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 192 § 1, effective July 1, 2019, rewrote the introductory language in (a), which read: "The professional teaching standards board shall by rule establish a program under which school districts shall reimburse no more than fifty (50) teachers and certified or licensed service providers employed by Wyoming school districts the actual cost of receiving national certification, not to exceed the national certification fee established by the national board for professional teaching standards for the applicable year certification was received, provided," in (a)(ii), substituted "teacher timely pays the teacher's portion of the certification fees and timely completes progress toward certification as required by the program" for "teacher or service provider, as applicable, was successful in receiving his national certification," and added (a)(iv); in (c), substituted "The legislature may appropriate funds to the department to implement subsection (a)" for "A school district may apply for an innovative program grant under W.S. 21-22-106(a)(iii) to recover amounts reimbursed to teachers and service providers under subsection (b)"; in the introductory language in (f), substituted "to the program established under subsection (a)" for "to reimbursement of the cost of national board certification under subsection (b)," in (f)(i), deleted "under paragraph (ii) of this subsection," rewrote (f)(ii), which read: "Effective school year 2007-2008 and each school year thereafter, the teacher holding certification shall be employed by the district full-time as a teacher. For purposes of this subsection, “teacher” shall include employees of the district holding certification and employed full-time as instructional facilitators, certified tutors, librarians or counselors," in (f)(iv), added the last sentence, and in (f)(v), substituted "January 31 of each year" for "December 31, 2007, and each December 31 thereafter"; and added (g).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 192 § 2, repealed (a)(iii), which read: "The teacher agrees to mentor at least one (1) other teacher employed in the state of Wyoming through the national certification process"; repealed (b), which read: "Upon verification by the professional teaching standards board that national certification is complete, the district which employs the teacher or service provider shall subject to the limit imposed under subsection (a) of this section, reimburse the teacher or service provider for the actual cost of the national certification fee"; and repealed (d), which read: "Teachers who accept reimbursement for their national certification costs under subsection (b) of this section shall serve as a mentor, under the supervision of the professional teaching standards board, for at least one (1) other teacher employed in the state of Wyoming through the national certification process. Teachers who accept reimbursement may also consent to be a consultant with local education agencies on staff development programs. Districts requesting consultation for staff development shall pay the consultant fees involved. No fee shall be charged for teachers seeking their own national certification."

Wyoming teacher of the year program. —

Laws 2005, ch. 178, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, appropriates $53,000 from the school foundation program account to the department of education to implement expansion of the Wyoming teacher of the year program for school year 2005-2006. Specifically, the department is to (1) establish a teacher of the year award for each school district within the state; (2) develop a selection process whereby each school district nominates a teacher to participate in the district-wide competition, to be selected by a committee assembled by the department which is comprised of school district teachers, administrators and board members together with business leaders, parents and members of the Wyoming legislature who are residents of the school district; (3) award each school district teacher of the year with an incentive payment equal to $1,000; and (4) provide for the selection of a Wyoming teacher of the year from among all selected school district teachers of the year, to receive an award equal to $5,000.

National teacher certification program. —

Laws 2005, ch. 178, § 3, appropriates $182,000 from the school foundation program account to the department of education for school year 2005-2006 to supplement amounts available under § 21-22-106(a)(iii) to districts for reimbursements to teachers for actual costs of national certification fees as provided under §

21-7-501

. A charter school operating within the district pursuant to §§

21-3-301

through

21-3-314

and employing teachers otherwise qualifying under §

21-7-501

is entitled to reimbursements under this section. In addition and notwithstanding limits imposed under § 21-7-501(a), the department, in consultation with the Wyoming professional teaching standards board, is to expend the appropriated funds, together with any funds received from private sources, to: (1) increase recruitment of teacher applicants for national certification; (2) establish a support system for teachers while in the process of obtaining national certification; and (3) provide awards and public recognition for teachers receiving national certification. Not later than July 1, 2006, the department is to report expenditures of amounts appropriated under this section to the joint education interim committee, and recommend any necessary modification to the national certification program established by § 21-7-501.

Teacher advancement program. —

Laws 2005, ch. 178, § 4, appropriates $400,000 from the school foundation program account to the department of education to initiate and pilot teacher advancement programs providing incentives and support for teachers during the 2005-2006 school year. Program components are to provide incentives and support for: (1) multiple career paths providing options to teachers for career advancement with corresponding increases in responsibility, compensation and leadership; (2) teacher compensation based upon classroom performance and student progress; (3) performance evaluation and promotion based upon knowledge and ability standards agreed to by teachers; (4) frequent, regularly scheduled collaborative professional development opportunities for teachers; and (5) expanded teacher certification programs and processes made available at alternative entry points. This appropriation may be expended for piloting a professional development program other than the teacher advancement program if the program substantially provides components similar to but not inclusive of these components. The department is to establish a qualification and selection process to determine school program participation based upon demonstrated ability to completely and effectively implement the program and the level of teacher and administrator interest. Except as otherwise provided, funds appropriated under this section are not to be expended by the department unless supplemented by federal or other nonstate funds. On or before July 1, 2006, the department is to report to the joint education interim committee on the expenditure of amounts appropriated under this section and provide recommendations to the committee on program continuation.